Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.490

Routine traffic enforcement information—Data collection—Training materials on racial profiling.

(1) The Washington state patrol shall work with the criminal justice training commission and the Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs to develop (a) further criteria for collection and evaluation of the data collected under RCW 43.43.480, and (b) training materials for use by the state patrol and local law enforcement agencies on the issue of racial profiling.

(2) The Washington state patrol, criminal justice training commission, and Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs shall encourage local law enforcement agencies to voluntarily collect the data set forth under RCW 43.43.480(1).

[ 2000 c 118 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2000 c 118: See note following RCW 43.43.480.